Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1410
Rules and regulations.

The director shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement any agreement entered into under the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 30.